Maryland, session 2025, HB1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1316*

HOUSE BILL 1316
SUBTITLE 22. STUDENT 9B. YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA
RESOURCE GUIDE.
7–2201. 7–9B–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CENTER” MEANS THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR SCHOOL MENTAL
HEALTH AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SCHOOL OF MEDICINE.
(C) “GUIDE” MEANS THE STUDENT YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY AND
SOCIAL MEDIA RESOURCE GUIDE.
(D) (1) “YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY” MEANS PRODUCTS,
PLATFORMS, AND SOFTWARE THAT IS DESIGNED FOR USE BY CHILDREN OR THAT IS
FREQUENTLY USED BY CHILDREN.
(2) “YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY” INCLUDES:
(I) SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS;
(II) ONLINE GAMES;
(III) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PRODUCTS;
(IV) NONALGORITHM–DRIVEN VIRTUAL COMMUNICATION
PLATFORMS;
(V) E–COMMERCE PLATFORMS;
(VI) SMART PHONES;
(VII) LAPTOPS; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER PRODUCT, SERVICE, OR DEVICE AN INDIVIDUAL
CAN USE TO COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER INDIVIDUALS THROUGH THE INTERNET.
7–2202. 7–9B–02.
(A) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE NATIONAL
CENTER FOR SCHOOL MENTAL HEALTH AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND
SCHOOL OF MEDICINE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL
DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A STUDENT YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL

HOUSE BILL 1316 3
MEDIA RESOURCE GUIDE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–2203 § 7–9B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) FOR THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE THE GUIDE SHALL
COVER COMMONLY USED TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY
FOR PERSONAL:
(I) PERSONAL USE BY CHILDREN; AND
(II) DELIVERING EDUCATION TO CHILDREN.
(3) FOR THE 2028–2029 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL COVER THE
INFORMATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND COMMONLY USED
TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS USED IN EDUCATION DELIVERY TO CHILDREN.
(4) FOR THE 2029–2030 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL BE
PUBLISHED INTO A MULTIMEDIA PRODUCT COVERING THE INFORMATION UNDER
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION THE CENTER SHALL COMPLETE THE
GUIDE BEFORE THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR.
(4) THE CENTER SHALL PERIODICALLY UPDATE THE GUIDE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE GUIDE IS TO PROVIDE:
(1) AGE–APPROPRIATE INFORMATION AND BEST PRACTICES FOR
YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY THAT:
(I) ENCOURAGES STUDENTS AND PARENTS AND GUARDIANS TO
UNDERSTAND HOW YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA CAN BE USED
AND MISUSED BY DEVELOPERS AND USERS; AND
(II) PROMOTES INFORMED DECISION MAKING WHEN USING
YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY; AND
(2) INFORMATION AND GUIDANCE ON THE SAFE USE OF
YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING THE INTERNET AND SOCIAL MEDIA BY
STUDENTS IN PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, THE CENTER SHALL
COMPLETE A NEEDS ASSESSMENT TO IDENTIFY ASSIST IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF
THE GUIDE.
(2) THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT SHALL INCLUDE A REVIEW OF:

HOUSE BILL 1316
(1) (I) EXISTING STATE AND FEDERAL RESOURCES TO ASSIST IN
DEVELOPING THE GUIDE FOR CONTRIBUTION TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE GUIDE;
(2) (II) EXISTING EFFORTS TO EDUCATE FAMILIES ON THE IMPACT
OF YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA ON THE MENTAL HEALTH OF
YOUTH IN THE STATE; AND
(3) (III) GAPS IN THE EXISTING RESOURCES AND EDUCATION
EFFORTS.
(C) THE GUIDE DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) AGE–APPROPRIATE INFORMATION AND BEST PRACTICES THAT:
(I) ENCOURAGE STUDENTS AND CAREGIVERS TO UNDERSTAND
HOW TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA CAN BE USED AND MISUSED BY DEVELOPERS
AND USERS; AND
(II) PROMOTE INFORMED DECISION MAKING WHEN USING
TECHNOLOGY, SOCIAL MEDIA, AND THE INTERNET;
(2) INFORMATION AND GUIDANCE ON SAFE INTERNET, TECHNOLOGY,
AND SOCIAL MEDIA USAGE BY STUDENTS IN PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE
12, INCLUDING:
(I) SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS;
(II) ONLINE GAMES;
(III) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PRODUCTS;
(IV) NON–ALGORITHM–DRIVEN VIRTUAL COMMUNICATION
PLATFORMS;
(V) E–COMMERCE PLATFORMS;
(VI) SMART PHONES;
(VII) LAPTOPS; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER PRODUCT, SERVICE, OR DEVICE AN INDIVIDUAL
CAN USE TO COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER INDIVIDUALS THROUGH THE INTERNET;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1316 5
(3) IF THE CENTER FINDS A GAP IN AVAILABLE INFORMATION
RELATING TO A SPECIFIC CATEGORY OF TECHNOLOGY OR SOCIAL MEDIA, A
REFERENCE TO THE LACK OF AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(D) THE GUIDE MAY INCLUDE OTHER STATE, FEDERAL, NONPROFIT, OR
PUBLIC RESOURCES.
7–2203. 7–9B–03.
(A) (1) THE GUIDE DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–2202 § 7–9B–02 OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE A SERVICE AND PRODUCT LANDSCAPE REVIEW OF
YOUTH–CENTRIC TECHNOLOGY THAT CONTAINS:
(1) (I) THE NAME OF A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(2) (II) THE PURPORTED FUNCTION OF THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(3) (III) ANY PRIVACY, SAFETY, OR SECURITY CONCERNS WITH
REGARD TO WHETHER AND HOW DATA IS CAPTURED, STORED, OR SHARED BY THE
PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(4) (IV) WHETHER THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE AFFECTS ADDICTIVE
QUALITIES IN A USER AND, IF SO, HOW;
(5) (V) WAYS IN WHICH A STUDENT IN PREKINDERGARTEN
THROUGH GRADE 12 COULD ACCESS A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE, INCLUDING
WHETHER A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE IS AVAILABLE THROUGH A DEVICE
PROVIDED BY A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(6) (VI) ANY INFORMATION ON THE POTENTIAL HARMFUL IMPACT
ON A USER, INCLUDING EMOTIONAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL, AND PHYSICAL IMPACTS; AND
(7) (VII) POSITIVE AND NEGATIVE IMPACT POTENTIAL ON ACADEMIC
GROWTH AND LEARNING.
(2) IF THE CENTER FINDS A GAP IN AVAILABLE INFORMATION
RELATING TO A SPECIFIC YOUTH–CENTERED TECHNOLOGY IN THE COURSE OF THE
LANDSCAPE REVIEW, THE CENTER SHALL MAKE A REFERENCE TO THE LACK OF
AVAILABLE INFORMATION IN THE GUIDE.
(B) THE GUIDE MAY INCLUDE OTHER STATE, FEDERAL, NONPROFIT, OR
PUBLIC RESOURCES.

HOUSE BILL 1316
(C) (1) THE GUIDE SHALL BE WRITTEN IN PLAIN ENGLISH AND CLEARLY
DISPLAY CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE CENTER.
(2) ON REQUEST, THE CENTER SHALL PROVIDE TRANSLATED COPIES
OF THE GUIDE.
7–2204. 7–9B–04.
FOR THE 2027–2028, 2028–2029, AND 2029–2030 SCHOOL YEARS BEGINNING
WITH THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF EACH
SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL BE:
(1) POSTED ON THE WEBSITES OF THE DEPARTMENT AND EACH
COUNTY BOARD; AND
(2) UPDATED EACH YEAR BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF THE SCHOOL
YEAR; AND
(3) DISTRIBUTED TO:
(I) EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL; AND
(II) THE PARENT TEACHER ORGANIZATION FOR EACH PUBLIC
SCHOOL.
7–2205.
(A) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS TO THE CENTER TO FUND THE
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT OF THE STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA
RESOURCE GUIDE:
(1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $100,000; AND
(2) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 AND 2029, $125,000.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
CENTER SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS USED TO
CONDUCT RESEARCH ON, DEVELOP, AND UPDATE THE STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND
SOCIAL MEDIA RESOURCE GUIDE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.